Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.040

Use of extortionate means to collect extensions of credit.

A person who knowingly participates in any way in the use of any extortionate means to collect or attempt to collect any extensions of credit or to punish any person for the nonrepayment thereof, is guilty of a class B felony.

[ 2001 c 222 s 6. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 5; 1984 c 270 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.